Utah statutes.
73-10-20.   Loans for water systems -- Legislative declaration.
The legislature recognizes and declares that the development, protection and
maintenance of adequate and safe water supplies for human consumption is vital
to public health, safety and welfare; that there exists within the state a
need to assist cities, towns, improvement districts, and special service
districts in providing an adequate and safe water supply for those users from
municipal and district systems; that the acquisition or construction of
systems and the improvement and extension of existing systems, based on proper
planning and sound engineering, will not only provide safer water supplies,
but will also serve to ensure that the water resources of the state are used
in an efficient manner and will avoid wasteful practices.
